District of Columbia statutes.
28-3313

Penalties.

Any lender who wilfully violates any provision of this chapter shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisoned for not more than 1 year, or both.

History

Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-62, § 4, 31 DCR 114
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 285(b), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28-3301.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3313.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 285(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.